Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201179-8,139
Reports.

(1) Each eligible institution shall file an annual report with the department for the
Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program and the Enhancing Excellence in
Teaching Program for any fiscal
year in which the eligible institution receives funding to distribute to students
pursuant to either or both of such programs containing such information
as required by rule and regulation. On or before December
31 of each even-numbered year, the department
shall submit a report to the Governor, the Clerk of the Legislature, and the
Education Committee of the Legislature on the status of the programs, the
status of the borrowers, and the impact of the programs on the number of teachers
in shortage areas in Nebraska and on the number of teachers receiving graduate
degrees in teaching endorsement areas in Nebraska. Each report shall include
information on an institution-by-institution basis, the status of borrowers,
and a financial statement with a description of the activity of the Excellence
in Teaching Cash Fund.

(2) Any report pursuant to this section which includes information
about borrowers shall exclude confidential information or any other information
which specifically identifies a borrower.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 22;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB333, § 9.
March 16, 2011